Louisiana, session 2026, HB1031.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Section 4 of Act 30 of the 2025 Regular Session is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall apply both prospectively and
retroactively and shall be applied to all claims existing and pending on the effective
date of this Act and all claims arising or actions filed on and after the effective date
of this Act. The provisions of this Act shall not be applied to revive claims
prescribed as of the effective date of this Act or to affect claims adjudicated on the
merits by a final and definitive judgment prior to the effective date of this Act.